src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON CEAKCAGAT !!= * __@CODE@__ Like seamu but plural only
                               +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>X4X7                   flagON-R        ;
                               +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>X4                     flagOFF-R       ;
                                     +N+Ess:%>X4n                    K               ;
                                     +N+Ess:%>X4n%>                  NPxC            ;
!                              +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>X8                     flagON-R        ; seems redundant, why is it here?
!                              +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>                       flagOFF-R       ; seems redundant, why is it here?
                                  +N+Pl+Nom:%>X2at                   K               ;
!                                 +N+Pl+Nom:%>X2ijddá%>              NPx1V           ;
                                  +N+Pl+Gen:%>X2ijd                  K               ;
                               +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>X2ijd                  R               ;
                                  +N+Pl+Acc:%>X2ijd                  K               ;
                                  +N+Pl+Ill:%>X2ijdda                K               ;
                                  +N+Pl+Loc:%>X2ijn                  K               ;
                         +N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X2ijnna                K               ;
                   +N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X2ijs                  K               ; ! !SOUTH
                                  +N+Pl+Com:%>X2ijgujn               K               ;
                               +N+Pl+Com/Sh:%>X2ij%-                 ENDLEX          ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
!                                 +N+Pl+Nom:%>X2ijddi%>              NPxVvowch       ; !^P^
                                  +N+Pl+Gen:%>X2ijddi%>              NPxVvowch       ;
                                  +N+Pl+Acc:%>X2ijddi%>              NPxVvowch       ;
                                  +N+Pl+Ill:%>X2ijddás%>             NPxC            ;
                                  +N+Pl+Loc:%>X2ijnni%>              NPxVvowch       ;
                                  +N+Pl+Com:%>X2ijddi%>              NPxPlComV1      ;
                    +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X2ažža%>n               K               ;
                    +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X2ažža%>n%>             NPxC            ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X2ažža%>X4t             K               ;
!       +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd%>          NPx1C           ;
!                +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%>    NPx1C           ;
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd            K               ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd      K               ;
     +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd            R               ;
              +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd      R               ;
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd%>          NPxC            ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%>    NPxC            ;
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd            K               ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd      K               ;
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd%>          NPxC            ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%>    NPxC            ;
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jde           K               ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjde     K               ;
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jdasa%>       NPxVvowch       ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjdasa%> NPxVvowch       ;
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jn            K               ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjn      K               ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5js            K               ; ! !SOUTH
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjs      K               ; ! !SOUTH
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jn%>          NPxC            ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjn%>    NPxC            ;
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jgujn         K               ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjgujn   K               ;
     +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5j%-           ENDLEX          ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
              +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPj%-     ENDLEX          ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd%>          NPxPlComC       ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%>    NPxPlComC       ;
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjn%>    NPxPlComC       ;
                                         +N:                         DenominalAdjsV1 ;
