src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON HyphNouns
EU-duháhat+CmpN/First:EU-duháh9 CEAKCAGAT ;
LEXICON Noun
ceakcagat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:ceak'cag8 CEAKCAGAT ;
dearvahat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:dear'vah9 CEAKCAGAT ;
eastagat:eas'tag8 CEAKCAGAT ;
